Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-10,158
Nail technology school; change of ownership or location; effect.

Each nail technology school license issued shall be in effect solely for the owner or owners and premises named thereon and shall expire automatically upon any change of ownership or change in the county of location. An original application for licensure shall be submitted and approved before such school may reopen, except that a school moving to a new location within the same county may do so by filing an application as required by the department, paying the required fee, submitting a new floor plan, and passing an operation inspection. Materials shall be received by the department no less than thirty days prior to the move, and all provisions of this section shall be complied with before the school may begin operation at its new location.

Laws 1999, LB 68, § 78;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-3,229;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 420.